Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB296.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Adverse drug reaction" or "ADR" means any unintended harmful
reaction or side effect to a psychotropic drug;
(b) "Child" means an individual under eighteen (18) years of age;
(c) "Medicaid-enrolled provider" means any licensed health professional
authorized to prescribe medication to Medicaid beneficiaries;
(d) "Medication Guide" means handouts accompanying certain prescription
medications with significant safety concerns as required under 21 C.F.R.
sec. 208.20;
(e) "Online reporting system" means a web-based platform through which
Medicaid beneficiaries or their parents or guardians can report ADRs
related to psychotropic drugs; and
(f) "Psychotropic drugs":
1. Means medications that affect the mind, emotions, or behavior of a
person, including but not limited to stimulants, antidepressants,
antipsychotics; and
2. Is limited to psychotropic drugs included on the Medicaid uniform
preferred drug list.
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/7/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1564
(2) (a) A Medicaid-enrolled provider prescribing psychotropic drugs to a child
covered by Medicaid shall provide a Medication Guide to the child's parents
or legal guardians before issuing a prescription.
(b) The Medication Guide shall be printed and reviewed with the parent or
legal guardian to inform them of:
1. FDA-identified side effects and cautionary monitoring citations of
additional potential risks;
2. Any FDA black box warning detailing serious or life-threatening
risks; and
3. Pediatric-specific side effects or warnings related to children and
teens.
(3) A Medicaid-enrolled provider shall obtain written informed consent from the
parent or legal guardian before prescribing a psychotropic drug to a child
covered by Medicaid. The consent shall be:
(a) Signed by the parent or legal guardian, confirming that he or she:
1. Has received and reviewed the Medication Guide; and
2. Understands the associated risks and side effects of the psychotropic
drug; and
(b) Kept on file by the Medicaid-enrolled provider, with a copy provided to the
parent or legal guardian.
(4) (a) The cabinet shall, within twelve (12) months after the effective date of this
Act, develop and maintain a secure online reporting system of ADRs related
to psychotropic drugs prescribed to children and adolescents covered by
Medicaid.
(b) The system required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include
free text fields for the:
1. Name of patient;
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/7/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1564
2. Name of medication;
3. Name of the person reporting;
4. Email address of the person reporting; and
5. Phone number of the person reporting.
(b) The system required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include
drop-down menus for the following:
1. Age of patient;
2. Class of psychotropic drug, including
a. Antidepressants;
b. Antipsychotics;
c. Mood stabilizers;
d. Stimulants;
e. Anti-anxiety drugs and sedatives;
f. Hypnotics; and
g. Unknown;
3. Type of adverse reaction experienced or observed, including:
a. Physical reaction, including:
i. Gastrointestinal issues, including nausea, vomiting,
diarrhea, or constipation;
ii. Neurological symptoms, including dizziness, headaches,
seizures, or tremors;
iii. Cardiovascular symptoms, including increased heart rate
or blood pressure changes; and
iv. Allergic reactions, rash, hives, or anaphylaxis;
b. Psychological reaction experienced or observed, including:
i. Mood changes, including irritability, depression, or
euphoria;
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/7/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1564
ii. Anxiety or panic attacks;
iii. Hallucinations or delusions;
iv. Agitation or restlessness; and
v. Suicidal thoughts or behaviors; and
c. Behavioral reaction experienced or observed, including:
i. Sleep disturbances, including insomnia or hypersomnia;
ii. Increased aggression or hostility;
iii. Manic behaviors;
iv. Cognitive impairments, including memory loss or
confusion;
v. Self-harm; and
vi. Disassociation;
4. Severity level of reaction, including:
a. Mild;
b. Moderate; and
c. Severe; and
5. Relation of person reporting, including:
a. Parent;
b. Foster parent;
c. Relative;
d. Legal guardian;
e. Case worker;
f. Social worker; and
g. Direct care staff.
(5) (a) The cabinet shall compile and submit a report no later than November 1,
2027, and each November 1 thereafter, summarizing ADR data related to
psychotropic drugs administered to children and adolescents covered by
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/7/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1564
Medicaid to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committees on Health Services and Families and Children.
(b) The report shall include:
1. The number of ADRs reported, categorized by patient age;
2. The totals of various severity levels of ADRs reported; and
3. A breakdown of ADRs by type of adverse reactions detailing the
number of incidents for each category.
(6) The cabinet shall submit a report no later than November 1, 2027, and each
November 1 thereafter summarizing implementation efforts and compliance
statistics of Medicaid-enrolled providers to the Legislative Research Commission
for referral to the Interim Joint Committees on Health Services and Families and
Children.
(7) Medicaid-enrolled providers failing to comply with subsections (2) and (3) of this
section may incur penalties, including but not limited to termination of Medicaid
enrollment.
(8) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section, including the establishment of
enforcement mechanisms and appropriate penalties for violations.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/7/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed